Utah statutes.
59-10-1306.   Homeless contribution -- Credit to Pamela Atkinson Homeless
Account.
(1)  Except as provided in Section 59-10-1304, a resident or nonresident
individual that files an individual income tax return under this chapter may
designate on the resident or nonresident individual's individual income tax
return a contribution to the Pamela Atkinson Homeless Account as provided in
this part.
(2)  The commission shall:
(a)  determine annually the total amount of contributions designated in
accordance with this section; and
(b)  credit the amount described in Subsection (2)(a) to the Pamela Atkinson
Homeless Account created by Section 9-4-803.
